New Jersey, session 222, S590.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any State law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a home care services agency licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.) may employ a certified nurse aide to work as a homemaker-home health aide. 2.  The New Jersey Board of Nursing may adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 3.  This act shall take effect 90 days after the date of enactment, except that the New Jersey Board of Nursing may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.